pt-PT: Local de instalação da fita do cinto de segurança: Cinta de extensão; Secção de cinto subabdominal; Cinta de substituição; Secção de cinto de ombro; Cinta de ancoragem/fixação; Outro
el: Θέση εγκατάστασης ιμάντα ζώνης ασφαλείας: Ιμάντας επέκτασης; Τμήμα ζώνης μέσης; Ανταλλακτικός ιμάντας; Τμήμα ιμάντα ώμου; Ιμάντας πρόσδεσης/αγκύρωσης; Άλλο
en: Seat belt strap installation location: Extender strap; Lap belt section; Replacement webbing; Shoulder strap section; Tether/anchor strap; Other
sv: Monteringsplats för säkerhetsbälte: Förlängningsrem; Höftbältesdel; Utbytesrem; Axelremsdel; Fäst-/förankringsrem; Övrigt
zh-TW: 安全帶綁帶安裝位置: 延長帶; 腰部安全帶部分; 替換織帶; 肩帶部分; 繫繩/固定帶; 其他
sk-SK: Umiestnenie montáže popruhu bezpečnostného pásu: Predlžovací popruh; Časť pre bedrový pás; Náhradný popruh; Časť pre ramenný popruh; Upevňovací/kotviaci popruh; Iné
ru: Место установки ленты ремня безопасности: Удлиняющий ремень; Поясная часть ремня; Сменная лента ремня; Плечевая часть ремня; Крепёжный/якорный ремень; Другое
fi: Turvavyön hihnan asennuspaikka: Jatkehihna; Lantiovyöosa; Vaihtohihna; Olkahihnaosa; Kiinnityshihna; Muu
ro-RO: Locația de instalare a chingii centurii de siguranță: Curea de extensie; Secțiunea centurii subabdominale; Chingă de schimb; Secțiunea curelei de umăr; Curea de prindere/ancorare; Altele
pl: Miejsce montażu paska pasa bezpieczeństwa: Pas przedłużający; Odcinek pasa biodrowego; Wymienna taśma; Odcinek pasa naramiennego; Pas mocujący/kotwiczący; Inne
ja: シートベルトストラップ取付位置: エクステンダーストラップ; ラップベルトセクション; 交換用ウェビング; ショルダーストラップセクション; テザー/アンカーストラップ; その他
ko: 안전벨트 스트랩 설치 위치: 익스텐더 스트랩; 랩 벨트 섹션; 교체용 웨빙; 어깨 스트랩 섹션; 테더/앵커 스트랩; 기타
da: Sted for installation af sikkerhedsselestrop: Forlængerstrop; Hofteseledel; Udskiftningsgjord; Skulderstropdel; Forankringsstrop; Andet
tr: Emniyet kemeri kayışı montaj konumu: Uzatma kayışı; Karın kemeri bölümü; Yedek dokuma kayış; Omuz kayışı bölümü; Bağlama/sabitleme kayışı; Diğer
fr: Emplacement d’installation de la sangle de ceinture: Sangle d'extension; Section de ceinture abdominale; Sangle de remplacement; Section de sangle d'épaule; Sangle d'attache/d'ancrage; Autre
nb: Monteringssted for setebelte: Forlengerstropp; Hoftebeltedel; Erstatningsbånd; Skulderstroppdel; Feste-/ankerstropp; Annet
de: Einbauort des Sicherheitsgurtbandes: Gurtverlängerung; Beckengurt-Abschnitt; Ersatzgurtband; Schultergurt-Abschnitt; Halte-/Ankergurt; Sonstige
pt-BR: Cinto de segurança local de instalação da tira: Alça extensora; Seção do cinto abdominal; Fita de substituição; Seção da tira de ombro; Tira de ancoragem/fixação; Outros
hr-HR: Mjesto ugradnje remena sigurnosnog pojasa: Produžni pojas; Dio za pojas preko krila; Zamjenska traka; Dio za rameni pojas; Traka za privezivanje/sidrenje; Ostalo
es: Lugar de instalación de la correa del cinturón de seguridad: Correa extensora; Sección del cinturón de regazo; Correa de repuesto; Sección de la correa del hombro; Correa de amarre/anclaje; Otro
zh-CN: 安全带织带安装位置: 延长带; 腹部安全带部分; 替换织带; 肩部安全带部分; 拴绳/锚定带; 其他
vi: Vị trí lắp đặt dây đai an toàn: Dây đai kéo dài; Phần đai ngang bụng; Đai thay thế; Phần dây đeo vai; Dây chằng/cố định; Khác
lt-LT: Saugos diržo juostos montavimo vieta: Ilginamasis diržas; Juosmens diržo sekcija; Pakaitinis audinys; Pečių diržo sekcija; Tvirtinimo diržas; Kita
sl-SI: Mesto namestitve traku varnostnega pasu: Podaljšek pasu; Del trebušnega pasu; Nadomestna tkanina; Del ramenskega traku; Zadrževalni/sidrni trak; Drugo
hu: Biztonságiöv-heveder beszerelési helye: Hosszabbítópánt; Medenceöv-rész; Csereheveder; Vállpántrész; Rögzítő-/horgonypánt; Egyéb
nl: Veiligheidsgordel band installatielocatie: Verlengriem; Heupgordeldeel; Vervangende riem; Schoudergordeldeel; Tether/ankerriem; Overig
bg-BG: Място за монтаж на лентата на предпазния колан: Удължаващ колан; Част на надбедрения колан; Резервна текстилна лента; Част на презраменния колан; Ограничителен/Анкерен колан; Други
th: ตำแหน่งติดตั้งสายเข็มขัดนิรภัย: สายต่อขยาย; ส่วนเข็มขัดคาดเอว; สายเข็มขัดเปลี่ยนทดแทน; ส่วนสายคาดไหล่; สายโยง/สายรัดสมอ; อื่นๆ
cs: Instalace bezpečnostního pásu v místě instalace: Prodlužovací popruh; Část pro břišní pás; Náhradní popruh; Část pro ramenní popruh; Kotvicí/upevňovací popruh; Jiné
it: Sede di installazione della cintura di sicurezza: Cinghia di estensione; Sezione della cintura addominale; Cinghia di ricambio; Sezione della cinghia da spalla; Cinghia di fissaggio/ancoraggio; Altro